Missouri, session 2026, HB2122.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 393.135, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 393.135 and 393.1250, to read as follows:
393.135. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section and section 393.1250,
any charge made or demanded by an electrical corporation for service, or in connection
therewith, which is based on the costs of construction work in progress upon any existing or
new [facility of the] electrical corporation facility, or any other cost associated with owning,
operating, maintaining, or financing any property before it is fully operational and used for
service, [is unjust and unreasonable, and] is prohibited.
2. (1) An electrical corporation may be permitted, subject to the limitations in this
subsection, to include construction work in progress for any new natural gas-generating unit
in rate base. The inclusion of construction work in progress allowed under this subsection
shall be in lieu of any otherwise applicable allowance for funds used during construction that
would have accrued from and after the effective date of new base rates that reflect inclusion
of the construction work in progress in rate base. The commission shall determine, in a
proceeding under section 393.170, the amount of construction work in progress that may be
included in rate base. The amount shall be limited by:
(a) The estimated cost of such project; and
(b) Project expenditures made within the estimated construction period for such
project.

EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2122 & 1626 2
Base rate recoveries arising from inclusion of construction work in progress in rate base are
subject to refund, with interest on the refunded amount at the same rate as the rate of interest
for delinquent taxes determined by the director of revenue in accordance with section 32.065,
if, and to the extent the commission determines, in a subsequent complaint or general rate
proceeding, that construction costs giving rise to the construction work in progress included
in rate base were imprudently incurred or if the project for which construction costs have been
included in the rate base is not placed in service within a reasonable amount of time, as
determined by the commission. Rate base used to determine return deferred under
subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section 393.1400 shall include an offset for rate base that
has been used to determine return included in base rates as a result of construction work in
progress inclusion in rate base under this subsection. The offset shall apply from and after the
in-service date of the asset that has been used to determine return included in base rates as a
result of construction work in progress inclusion in rate base under this subsection.
(2) This subsection shall expire on December 31, 2035, unless the commission
determines, after a hearing conducted in 2035, upon a submission from an electrical
corporation of an application requesting and demonstrating that good cause exists to extend
the effectiveness of this subsection through December 31, 2045. The secretary of the
commission shall notify the revisor of statutes when the conditions set forth for the extension
of this subsection have been met.
393.1250. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Nuclear Clean Power Act", the purpose of which is to enable the construction of clean
baseload electric generating plants. This section shall not apply to clean baseload
electric generating plants that are in commercial operation before August 28, 2026.
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Clean baseload generating plant", a new nuclear-fueled electric generating
facility located in this state that is designed to be operated at six hundred megawatts or
less and is intended in whole or in part to serve retail customers of an electrical
corporation in Missouri;
(2) "Construction work in progress", the electrical corporation's share of all
capital costs associated with a clean baseload generating plant or renewable source
generating facility that have been incurred but have not been included in the electrical
corporation's plant in service and are recorded in the Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission's Uniform System of Accounts Prescribed for Public Utilities and Licensees
Subject to the Provisions of the Federal Power Act, Balance Sheet Chart Accounts, as
construction work in progress for electric plants in 18 CFR Part 101, or any other
account established in the Uniform System of Accounts for the recording of construction
work in progress.

HCS HBs 2122 & 1626 3
3. An electrical corporation shall be permitted, subject to the limitations in this
subsection, to include construction work in progress for any new clean baseload
generating plant in rate base amounts recorded. The inclusion of construction work in
progress allowed under this subsection shall be in lieu of any otherwise applicable
allowance for funds used during construction that would have accrued from and after
the effective date of new base rates that reflect inclusion of the construction work in
progress in rate base. The commission shall determine, in a proceeding under section
393.170, the amount of construction work in progress that may be included in rate base.
The amount shall be limited by the estimated cost of such project and project
expenditures made within the estimated construction period for such project. Base rate
recoveries arising from inclusion of construction work in progress in base rates are
subject to refund, together with interest on the refunded amount at the same rate as the
rate of interest for delinquent taxes determined by the director of revenue in accordance
with section 32.065, if, and to the extent the commission determines, in a subsequent
complaint or general rate proceeding, that construction costs giving rise to the
construction work in progress included in rate base were imprudently incurred or if the
project for which construction costs have been included in the rate base is not placed in
service within a reasonable amount of time, as determined by the commission. Return
deferred under subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section 393.1400 for plant that has been
included in base rates as construction work in progress shall offset the amounts deferred
under section 393.1400.
4. This section shall expire on December 31, 2036, unless the commission
determines, after a hearing conducted in 2036, upon a submission from an electrical
corporation of an application requesting and demonstrating that good cause exists to
extend the effectiveness of this section through December 31, 2046. The secretary of the
commission shall notify the revisor of statutes when the conditions set forth for the
extension of this subsection have been met.
5. The commission may promulgate rules to assist in the implementation of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,

HCS HBs 2122 & 1626 4
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔